District of Columbia statutes.
8-1778.48

Rules.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

May 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-183, § 308, 57 DCR 3406
This section is referenced in § 8-1778.01.
Section 209 of D.C. Law 18-156 added a section to read as follows: “Sec. 209. Rules. The Mayor, pursuant to Title 1 of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), may issue rules to implement the provisions of this act.”
Section 402(b) of D.C. Law 18-156 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 209 of Energy Efficiency Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-324, March 1, 2010, 57 DCR 1851).
Delegation of Authority—Energy Efficiency Financing Act of 2010, see Mayor’s Order 2010-118, July 16, 2010 ( 57 DCR 6212).